Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1506
Election records; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any deputy registrar, judge or clerk of election, or other officer having the custody of records, registers, copies of records or registers, oaths, certificates, or any other paper, document, or evidence of any description by law directed to be made, filed, or preserved who steals, willfully destroys, mutilates, defaces, falsifies, or fraudulently removes such paper, document, or evidence or any part thereof, who fraudulently makes an entry, erasure, or alteration in such paper, document, or evidence except as allowed and directed by the Election Act, who permits any other person to commit any violation listed in this section, or who advises, procures, or abets the commission of such a violation shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall forfeit his or her office. Any other person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 405.